Ohio, session 136, HB523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3319.70, 3345.84, and 6301.113 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3319.70. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public school" means all of the following: (a) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; (b) An educational service center; (c) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (d) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (2) "Student teacher" means an individual who teaches students either independently or under supervision or participates in a similar field experience as part of a teacher preparation program approved under section 3333.048 of the Revised Code. (B) A public school may pay a student teacher in the school a stipend in an amount determined by the school. Sec. 3345.84. A state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, may establish a lower differential tuition rate, which may include a waiver of general or instructional fees, for an individual enrolled in a teacher preparation program approved under section 3333.048 of the Revised Code for the period in which the individual is working as a student teacher or participating in any teacher preparation program field experience the state institution of higher education determines to be similar to student teaching. Sec. 6301.113. In addition to the requirement in section 6301.11 of the Revised Code that the department of job and family services create a list of in-demand jobs, and notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the methodology developed under that section, the department, in consultation with the department of education and workforce, shall use data collected, published, and summarized pursuant to section 3301.82 of the Revised Code to create a list of in-demand teaching jobs in the state and a list of such in-demand teaching jobs in each region of the state. In the list, the department shall identify the license required for each in-demand teaching job. The department of job and family services and the department of education and workforce shall publish the list on the web sites of each department. The departments shall periodically update the list to reflect changes in the data collected and published under section 3301.82 of the Revised Code. The department of job and family services shall create, and both departments shall publish, the initial list as soon as practicable after the effective date of this section. Section 2. This act shall be known as the Future Educators Support Act.